Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-295
Meetings.

(MBCA 8.20) (a) The board of directors
may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

(b) Unless the articles
of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit
any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or
conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which
all directors participating may simultaneously hear each other during the
meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to
be present in person at the meeting.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 95.